Utah statutes.
49-15-203.   Exemption of certain employees from coverage.
(1)  A public safety service employee serving as the Commissioner of Public
Safety, or as the elected or appointed sheriff or chief of police of a public
safety organization, is excluded from coverage under this system if that
public safety service employee files a formal written request seeking
exemption.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the public safety service employee
may not continue employment with the same participating employer and receive
an allowance from the office based on public safety service at the same time.
(3) (a)  The Commissioner of Public Safety, an elected sheriff, or an
appointed chief of police who is eligible to retire under Section 49-15-401
may until July 1, 2010:
(i)  retire from this system and receive an allowance;
(ii)  continue in the elected or appointed position; and
(iii)  file for the exemption under Subsection (1).
(b)  A person who makes an election under Subsection (3)(a) may continue under
the terms of the election.
